Utah statutes.
53-3-215.   Duplicate license certificate -- Fee.

(1) (a)  If a license certificate issued under this chapter is lost, stolen, or destroyed, the person to whom the license certificate was issued may obtain a duplicate upon furnishing proof satisfactory to the division that the license certificate has been lost, stolen, or destroyed and upon payment of a duplicate fee under Section 53-3-105.

(b)  A person may not be issued a duplicate license certificate under this section unless the person complies with Subsection 53-3-204(2)(f).

(2)  When the division is advised that a license certificate has been lost, stolen, or destroyed, the license certificate is then void.



Amended by Chapter 335, 2012 General Session

